Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2450
Consideration of voting rights; special meeting; conditions.

(1) If the acquiring person (a) makes a request in writing for a special meeting of the shareholders at the time of delivery of the information statement, (b) has made a control-share acquisition or has made a bona fide written offer to make a control-share acquisition, and (c) gives a written undertaking, within ten days after receipt by the issuing public corporation of the information statement, to pay or reimburse the issuing public corporation's expenses of a special meeting of the shareholders, a special meeting of the shareholders of the issuing public corporation shall be called for the purpose of considering the voting rights to be accorded to shares acquired or to be acquired pursuant to the control-share acquisition. The special meeting shall be held no later than fifty days after receipt of the information statement unless the acquiring person agrees to a later date. If the acquiring person so requests in writing at the time of delivery of the information statement, the special meeting shall not be held sooner than thirty days after receipt by the issuing corporation of the information statement.

(2) If no request for a special meeting is made, consideration of the voting rights to be accorded to shares acquired or to be acquired pursuant to the control-share acquisition shall be presented at the next special or annual meeting of the shareholders, notice of which has not been given prior to the receipt of the information statement, unless the matter of the voting rights becomes moot.

(3) The notice of the meeting shall be accompanied at a minimum by a copy of the information statement, a copy of any amendment to the information statement previously delivered to the issuing public corporation, and a statement disclosing that the board of the issuing public corporation recommends approval of, expresses no opinion and is remaining neutral toward, recommends rejection of, or is unable to take a position with respect to according voting rights to shares acquired or to be acquired in the control-share acquisition. The notice of meeting shall be given at least thirty days before the meeting.

Laws 1988, LB 1110, § 20.